Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-104
Public land; record of confirmation; receipt as evidence.

Each such copy, the record thereof, or a transcript of such record, certified under the hand and seal of the county clerk in whose office the same shall be recorded, shall be received in all courts and places whatever as evidence of each and every fact and thing therein stated, as well as of the absolute title of the United States in and to the lands therein described at the date of such communication.

Laws 1872, § 4, p. 8;

R.S.1913, § 5841;

C.S.1922, § 5177;

C.S.1929, § 72-104;

R.S.1943, § 72-104.